Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201671-4208
Emergency medical service; use of stroke triage assessment tool; establish protocols.

(1) Beginning on January 1, 2017, an emergency medical service licensed pursuant to the Emergency Medical Services Practice Act shall use a stroke triage assessment tool that is substantially similar to the stroke triage assessment tool adopted by the department under section 71-4207.

(2) Beginning on January 1, 2017, a licensed emergency medical service shall establish pre-hospital-care protocols related to the assessment, treatment, and transport of a stroke patient by the emergency medical service.

Laws 2016, LB722, § 8.

Emergency Medical Services Practice Act, see section 38-1201.